dev/wikt.full-form.pl.dix
    <pardef n="piąt/ek__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>ek</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ek</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kowi</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kiem</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ków</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kom</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kach</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kami</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ślimak__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iem</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tal__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chłopak__n_mp">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iem</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>chłopacy/i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>chłopacy/i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="źród/ło__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>ło</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ło</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ła</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>łu</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>le</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>łem</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ło</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ła</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ła</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eł</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>łom</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>łach</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>łami</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ła</l><r>ło<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aborcj/a__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ę</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ą</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i/aborcyj</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aborcja"><i>aborcj</i><par n="aborcj/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="beryl"><i>beryl</i><par n="tal__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="chłopak"><i>chłopak</i><par n="chłopak__n_mp"/></e>
    <e lm="czwartek"><i>czwart</i><par n="piąt/ek__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="piątek"><i>piąt</i><par n="piąt/ek__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="szczupak"><i>szczupak</i><par n="ślimak__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="tal"><i>tal</i><par n="tal__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="wtorek"><i>wtor</i><par n="piąt/ek__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="wyjątek"><i>wyjąt</i><par n="piąt/ek__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="związek"><i>związ</i><par n="piąt/ek__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="ślimak"><i>ślimak</i><par n="ślimak__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="źródło"><i>źród</i><par n="źród/ło__n_mi"/></e>
